Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4810
Mediation period; duration; continuation.

The farm mediation service shall conduct and conclude a mediation meeting during the mediation period which extends for sixty days after the farm mediation service receives the mediation request. If all parties consent, mediation may continue after the end of the mediation period. If any party elects not to participate in mediation, the farm mediation service shall so notify all parties.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 10.